Hawaii statutes.
§576B-602 Procedure to register
order for enforcement. (a) Except as otherwise provided in section
576B-706, a support order or income withholding order of another state or a
foreign support order may be registered in this State by sending the following
records to the registering tribunal in this State:

(1) A letter of transmittal to the tribunal
requesting registration and enforcement;

(2) Two copies, including one certified copy, of the
order to be registered, including any modification of the order;

(3) A sworn statement by the person requesting
registration or a certified statement by the custodian of the record showing
the amount of any arrearage;

(4) The name of the obligor and, if known:

(A) The obligor's address and social security
number;

(B) The name and address of the obligor's
employer and any other source of income of the obligor; and

(C) A description and the location of
property of the obligor in this State not exempt from execution; and

(5) Except as otherwise provided in section 576B‑312,
the name and address of the obligee and, if applicable, the person to whom
support payments are to be remitted.

(b) On receipt of a request for registration,
the registering tribunal shall cause the order to be filed as an order of a
tribunal of another state or a foreign support order, together with one copy of
the documents and information, regardless of their form.

(c) A petition or comparable pleading seeking
a remedy that must be affirmatively sought under other law of this State may be
filed at the same time as the request for registration or later. The pleading
shall specify the grounds for the remedy sought.

(d) If two or more orders are in effect, the
person requesting registration shall:

(1) Furnish to the tribunal a copy of every support
order asserted to be in effect in addition to the documents specified in this
section;

(2) Specify the order alleged to be the controlling
order, if any; and

(3) Specify the amount of consolidated arrears, if
any.

(e) A request for a determination of which is
the controlling order may be filed separately or with a request for
registration and enforcement or for registration and modification. The person
requesting registration shall give notice of the request to each party whose
rights may be affected by the determination. [L 1997, c 295, pt of §1; am L
2015, c 77, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next